Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5703
Municipality Infrastructure Aid Program; created; purpose.

The Municipality Infrastructure Aid Program is created. The Department of Economic Development shall administer the program. The purpose of the program is to finance infrastructure improvements in cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and villages.

Laws 2024, LB600, § 3.